Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 9. Coverage for Additional Populations

§ 2091.
Dr. Dynasaur-like coverage; legislative intent.

In establishing Dr. Dynasaur-like coverage for children and pregnant individuals who are not eligible for the Dr. Dynasaur program because of their immigration status, it is the intent of the General Assembly that the hospital, medical, dental, and prescription drug benefits and eligibility criteria for the coverage set forth in section 2092 of this chapter should align to the greatest extent practicable with the benefits and eligibility criteria of the Dr. Dynasaur program.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 48

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2021.

§ 2092.
Dr. Dynasaur-like coverage for certain Vermont residents.

As used in this section, the term “Vermont residents who have an immigration status for which Medicaid coverage is not available” includes migrant workers who are employed in seasonal occupations in this State.

The Agency of Human Services shall provide hospital, medical, dental, and prescription drug coverage equivalent to coverage in the Vermont Medicaid State Plan to the following categories of Vermont residents who have an immigration status for which Medicaid coverage is not available and who are otherwise uninsured:

children under 19 years of age whose household income does not exceed the income threshold for eligibility under the Vermont Medicaid State Plan; and

pregnant individuals whose household income does not exceed the income threshold for eligibility under the Vermont Medicaid State Plan for coverage during their pregnancy and for postpartum coverage equivalent to that available under the Vermont Medicaid State Plan.

The confidentiality provisions set forth in section 1902a of this chapter shall apply to all applications submitted and records created pursuant to this section, except that the Agency of Human Services shall not make any information regarding applicants or enrollees available to the United States government.

The Agency of Human Services may adopt rules in accordance with 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to carry out the purposes of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 48

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2021.

2021, No. 48

, § 4(b) provides: “The remaining sections shall take effect on passage [June 1, 2021], with the Agency of Human Services making coverage available to Vermont residents who have an immigration status for which Medicaid coverage is not available in accordance with Sec. 1 (

33 V.S.A. § 2092

) beginning on July 1, 2022, subject to fiscal year 2023 appropriations for this purpose.”